tables/gujarati.cti
# This table contains braille codes and rules for Gujarati script.
#
# Copyright (C) 2014 National Institute for Visually Handicapped, 116, Rajpur Road, Dehradun, Uttrakhand, India
#
# This file is part of liblouis.
#
# liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
# under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
# published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
# License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
# WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
# Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License along with liblouis. If not, see
# <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# This table was built and maintained under an activity of Braille Council of India and then modified after release of new Bharti braille code which was released on January 4, 2025
# Contributors: Dipendra Manocha, Sreeja, Dinesh Kaushal, Mesar Hameed
# Last updated on January 28, 2025
# To report any bugs or any suggestion, please write to dipendra@saksham.org and sreeja@saksham.org

include braille-patterns.cti

# Vowels
    
letter   \x0A81	3	# GUJARATI SIGN CHANDRABINDU
letter   \x0A82	56	# GUJARATI SIGN ANUSVARA
letter   \x0A83	6	# GUJARATI SIGN VISARGA
letter   \x0A85	1	# GUJARATI LETTER A
letter   \x0A86	345	# GUJARATI LETTER  AA
letter   \x0A87	24	# GUJARATI LETTER I
letter   \x0A88	35	# GUJARATI LETTER II
letter   \x0A89	136	# GUJARATI LETTER U
letter   \x0A8A	1256	# GUJARATI LETTER UU
noback letter   \x0A8B	5-1235	# GUJARATI LETTER VOCALIC R
noback letter   \x0A8C	5-123	# GUJARATI LETTER VOCALIC L (USED WITH SANSKRIT TEXT)
letter   \x0A8D	26	# GUJARATI VOWEL CANDRA E
letter   \x0A8F	15	# GUJARATI LETTER E
letter   \x0A90	34	# GUJARATI LETTER AI
letter   \x0A91	1346	# GUJARATI LETTER Candra o
letter   \x0A93	135	# GUJARATI LETTER O
letter   \x0A94	246	# GUJARATI LETTER AU

replace \x200D

# Consonents

letter   \x0A95	13	# GUJARATI LETTER KA
letter   \x0A96	46	# GUJARATI LETTER KHA
letter   \x0A97	1245	# GUJARATI LETTER GA
letter   \x0A98	126	# GUJARATI LETTER GHA
letter   \x0A99	346	# GUJARATI LETTER NGA

letter   \x0A9A	14	# GUJARATI LETTER CHA
letter   \x0A9B	16	# GUJARATI LETTER CHA
letter   \x0A9C	245	# GUJARATI LETTER JA
letter   \x0A9D	356	# GUJARATI LETTER JHA
letter   \x0A9E	25	# GUJARATI LETTER NYA

letter   \x0A9F	23456	# GUJARATI LETTER TTA
letter   \x0AA0	2456	# GUJARATI LETTER TTHA
letter   \x0AA1	1246	# GUJARATI LETTER DDA
letter   \x0AA2	123456	# GUJARATI LETTER DDHA
letter   \x0AA3	3456	# GUJARATI LETTER NNA

letter   \x0AA4	2345	# GUJARATI LETTER TA
letter   \x0AA5	1456	# GUJARATI LETTER THA
letter   \x0AA6	145	# GUJARATI LETTER DA
letter   \x0AA7	2346	# GUJARATI LETTER DHA
letter   \x0AA8	1345	# GUJARATI LETTER NA

letter   \x0AAA	1234	# GUJARATI LETTER PA
letter   \x0AAB	124	# GUJARATI LETTER PHA
letter   \x0AAC	12	# GUJARATI LETTER BA
letter   \x0AAD	45	# GUJARATI LETTER BHA
letter   \x0AAE	134	# GUJARATI LETTER MA

letter   \x0AAF	13456	# GUJARATI LETTER YA
letter   \x0AB0	1235	# GUJARATI LETTER RA
letter   \x0AB2	123	# GUJARATI LETTER LA
letter   \x0AB3	456	# GUJARATI LETTER LLA
letter   \x0AB5	1236	# GUJARATI LETTER VA
letter   \x0AB6	146	# GUJARATI LETTER SHA
letter   \x0AB7	12346	# GUJARATI LETTER SSA
letter   \x0AB8	234	# GUJARATI LETTER SA
letter   \x0AB9	125	# GUJARATI LETTER HA
letter   \x0ABD	2	# GUJARATI SIGN AVAGRAHA

letter   \x0ABE	345	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN AA
letter   \x0ABF	24	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN I (STANDS TO THE LEFT OF THE CONSONANT)
letter   \x0AC0	35	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN II
letter   \x0AC1	136	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN U
letter   \x0AC2	1256	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN UU
letter   \x0AC3	5-1235	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC R
letter   \x0AC4	6-1235	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC RR
letter   \x0AC5	26	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN CANDRA E
letter   \x0AC7	15	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN E
letter   \x0AC8	34	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN AI
letter   \x0AC9	1346	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN Candra o
letter   \x0ACB	135	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN O
letter   \x0ACC	246	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN AU

letter   \x0ACD	4	# GUJARATI SIGN VIRAMA
letter   \x0AD0	5-1256	# GUJARATI OM
letter   \x0AE0	 6-1235	# GUJARATI LETTER VOCALIC RR
letter   \x0AE1	6-123	# GUJARATI LETTER VOCALIC LL
letter   \x0AE2	5-123	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC L
letter   \x0AE3	6-123	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC LL

# Digits

digit   \x0AE6	245	# GUJARATI DIGIT ZERO
digit   \x0AE7	1	# GUJARATI DIGIT ONE
digit   \x0AE8	12	# GUJARATI DIGIT TWO
digit   \x0AE9	14	# GUJARATI DIGIT THREE
digit   \x0AEA	145	# GUJARATI DIGIT FOUR
digit   \x0AEB	15	# GUJARATI DIGIT FIVE
digit   \x0AEC	124	# GUJARATI DIGIT SIX
digit   \x0AED	1245	# GUJARATI DIGIT SEVEN
digit   \x0AEE	125	# GUJARATI DIGIT EIGHT
digit   \x0AEF	24	# GUJARATI DIGIT NINE

litdigit   \x0AE6	245	# GUJARATI DIGIT ZERO
litdigit   \x0AE7	1	# GUJARATI DIGIT ONE
litdigit   \x0AE8	12	# GUJARATI DIGIT TWO
litdigit   \x0AE9	14	# GUJARATI DIGIT THREE
litdigit   \x0AEA	145	# GUJARATI DIGIT FOUR
litdigit   \x0AEB	15	# GUJARATI DIGIT FIVE
litdigit   \x0AEC	124	# GUJARATI DIGIT SIX
litdigit   \x0AED	1245	# GUJARATI DIGIT SEVEN
litdigit   \x0AEE	125	# GUJARATI DIGIT EIGHT
litdigit   \x0AEF	24	# GUJARATI DIGIT NINE

# Half letters

always   \x0A95\x0ACD	4-13	# GUJARATI LETTER KA
always   \x0A96\x0ACD	4-46	# GUJARATI LETTER KHA
always   \x0A97\x0ACD	4-1245	# GUJARATI LETTER GA
always   \x0A98\x0ACD	4-126	# GUJARATI LETTER GHA
always   \x0A99\x0ACD	4-346	# GUJARATI LETTER NGA

always   \x0A9A\x0ACD	4-14	# GUJARATI LETTER CA
always   \x0A9B\x0ACD	4-16	# GUJARATI LETTER CHA
always   \x0A9C\x0ACD	4-245	# GUJARATI LETTER JA
always   \x0A9D\x0ACD	4-356	# GUJARATI LETTER JHA
always   \x0A9E\x0ACD 	4-25	# GUJARATI LETTER NYA

always   \x0A9F\x0ACD	4-23456	# GUJARATI LETTER TTA
always   \x0AA0\x0ACD	4-2456	# GUJARATI LETTER TTHA
always   \x0AA1\x0ACD	4-1246	# GUJARATI LETTER DDA
always   \x0AA2\x0ACD	4-123456	# GUJARATI LETTER DDHA
always   \x0AA3\x0ACD	4-3456	# GUJARATI LETTER NNA

always   \x0AA4\x0ACD	4-2345	# GUJARATI LETTER TA
always   \x0AA5\x0ACD	4-1456	# GUJARATI LETTER THA
always   \x0AA6\x0ACD	4-145	# GUJARATI LETTER DA
always   \x0AA7\x0ACD	4-2346	# GUJARATI LETTER DHA
always   \x0AA8\x0ACD	4-1345	# GUJARATI LETTER NA

always   \x0AAA\x0ACD	4-1234	# GUJARATI LETTER PA
always   \x0AAB\x0ACD	4-124	# GUJARATI LETTER PHA
always   \x0AAC\x0ACD	4-12	# GUJARATI LETTER BA
always   \x0AAD\x0ACD	4-45	# GUJARATI LETTER BHA
always   \x0AAE\x0ACD	4-134	# GUJARATI LETTER MA
always   \x0AAF\x0ACD	4-13456	# GUJARATI LETTER YA
always   \x0AB0\x0ACD	4-1235	# GUJARATI LETTER RA
always   \x0AB2\x0ACD	4-123	# GUJARATI LETTER LA
always   \x0AB3\x0ACD	4-456	# GUJARATI LETTER LLA
always   \x0AB5\x0ACD	4-1236	# GUJARATI LETTER VA
always   \x0AB6\x0ACD	4-146	# GUJARATI LETTER SHA
always   \x0AB7\x0ACD	4-12346	# GUJARATI LETTER SSA
always   \x0AB8\x0ACD	4-234	# GUJARATI LETTER SA
always   \x0AB9\x0ACD	4-125	# GUJARATI LETTER HA

always   \x0AC3\x0ACD	4-5-1235	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC R
always   \x0AC4\x0ACD	4-6-1235	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC RR
always   \x0AE0\x0ACD	4-6-1235	# GUJARATI LETTER VOCALIC RR
always   \x0AE1\x0ACD	4-6-123	# GUJARATI LETTER VOCALIC LL
always   \x0AE2\x0ACD	4-5-123	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC L
always   \x0AE3\x0ACD	4-6-123 	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC LL

# ksha and gya

always \x0A95\x0ACD\x0AB7\x0ACD 4-12345 #"ksha"
always \x0A9C\x0ACD\x0A9E 156 #gyan
always \x0A95\x0ACD\x0AB7 12345 #"ksha"

# vowels in backtranslation

# generally letters if on their own or at start of word
sufword   \x0A85	1	# GUJARATI LETTER A
sufword   \x0A86	345	# GUJARATI LETTER  AA
sufword   \x0A87	24	# GUJARATI LETTER I
sufword   \x0A88	35	# GUJARATI LETTER II
sufword   \x0A89	136	# GUJARATI LETTER U
sufword   \x0A8A	1256	# GUJARATI LETTER UU
sufword   \x0A8B	5-1235	# GUJARATI LETTER VOCALIC R
sufword   \x0A8C	5-123	# GUJARATI LETTER VOCALIC L (USED WITH SANSKRIT TEXT)
sufword   \x0A8D	26	# GUJARATI VOWEL CANDRA E
sufword   \x0A8F	15	# GUJARATI LETTER E
sufword   \x0A90	34	# GUJARATI LETTER AI
sufword   \x0A91	1346	# GUJARATI LETTER Candra o
sufword   \x0A93	135	# GUJARATI LETTER O
sufword   \x0A94	246	# GUJARATI LETTER AU

# generally matras in middle of word
always   \x0ABE	345	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN AA
always   \x0ABF	24	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN I (STANDS TO THE LEFT OF THE CONSONANT)
always   \x0AC0	35	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN II
always   \x0AC1	136	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN U
always   \x0AC2	1256	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN UU
always   \x0AC3	5-1235	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC R
always   \x0AC4	6-1235	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC RR
always   \x0AC5	26	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN CANDRA E
always   \x0AC7	15	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN E
always   \x0AC8	34	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN AI
always   \x0AC9	1346	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN Candra o
always   \x0ACB	135	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN O
always   \x0ACC	246	# GUJARATI VOWEL SIGN AU


always \x0A82\x0A88 56-35 # ANUSVARA + LETTER II
